District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-1122

Termination, cancellation, or failure to renew franchise.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-185, § 3, 35 DCR 7906
April 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1002, 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-1122.
1981 Ed., § 29-1202.